Mississippi, session 2026, SB2831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-19-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-51.  (1)  (a)  In recognition of their many and varied patriotic services rendered the state, the United States and the citizens thereof, Mississippians who have completed an active duty career with the Armed Forces of the United States and active duty and retired members of the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, and the United States Reserves, including both enlisted and officer personnel, upon application and subject to the provisions of this section may be issued distinctive motor vehicle license plates or tags identifying these persons with such organizations.  For the purposes of this section the term "Armed Forces" includes the United States Merchant Marines and members thereof in maritime service during the period from December 7, 1941 to August 15, 1945. The distinctive plates or tags so issued shall comply with the provisions of Section 27-19-41 and shall be of such color and design as may be agreed upon by the Adjutant General and the Department of Revenue for the Army National Guard or Air National Guard, by the Mississippi chapters of the Retired Officers Association and the Retired Non-Commissioned Officers Association and the Department of Revenue for retired active duty members of the Armed Forces of the United States, and by the Department of Revenue for retired members of the United States Merchant Marines.  Each distinctive license plate shall bear the words "National Guard" or the name of the appropriate armed service and need not bear prefixed numbers identifying the county of issuance. (b)  In recognition of their many and varied patriotic services rendered the state, the United States and the citizens thereof, Mississippians who are active duty and retired members of the Army National Guard and/or the Air National Guard, including both enlisted and officer personnel, upon application and subject to the provisions of this section may be issued distinctive motorcycle license plates or tags identifying these persons with such organizations.  The distinctive plates or tags so issued shall comply with the provisions of Section 27-19-41 and shall be of such color and design as may be agreed upon by the Adjutant General and the Department of Revenue.  Each distinctive license plate shall bear the words "National Guard" and need not bear prefixed numbers identifying the county of issuance. (2)  The surviving spouse of any person who was issued a distinctive license plate or tag under subsection (1) of this section because of completion of an active duty career with the Armed Forces of the United States or because of retirement from the Army National Guard, Air National Guard or United States Reserves, or any prisoner of war issued a distinctive license plate or tag under Section 27-19-54, shall be eligible to receive the same type of distinctive license plate or tag which the deceased spouse was issued. (3)  The distinctive license plates here provided for shall be prepared by the Department of Revenue and shall be issued through the tax collectors of the several counties of the state in like manner as are other motor vehicle license plates or tags and motorcycle license plates or tags and such officers shall be entitled to their regular fees for such service.  Applicants for such distinctive plates shall present to the issuing official proof of their membership in the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, or United States Reserves by means of certificate signed by the commanding officer of such applicant on forms prescribed by the Adjutant General of Mississippi.  Retired members of the Armed Forces of the United States applying for such plates shall present to the issuing officials a copy of their active duty retirement orders, DD Form 214, or other proof of retirement from active service with one of the Armed Forces of the United States.  Other discharged members of the Armed Forces of the United States applying for such plates shall present to the issuing officials a copy of their DD Form 214.  The distinctive license plates or tags so issued shall be used only upon and for personally or jointly owned private passenger vehicles (to include station wagons, recreational motor vehicles and pickup trucks) and/or motorcycles registered in the name, or jointly in the name, of the member making application therefor, and when so issued to such applicant shall be used upon the vehicle or motorcycle for which issued in lieu of the standard license plate or license tag normally issued for such vehicle or motorcycle. (4)  In addition to use of such distinctive license plates or tags on such personally or jointly owned vehicles, such distinctive plate or tag may be used on state-owned vehicles operated by the State Military Department provided the prefix "MNG" is placed ahead of the number thereon.  Motor vehicles for which such distinctive license plates or tags are issued shall be registered by the proper official as are other motor vehicles. (5)  The distinctive license plates issued hereunder shall not be transferable between motor vehicle or motorcycle owners; and in the event the owner of a vehicle or motorcycle bearing such distinctive plate shall sell, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of the vehicle or motorcycle, such plate shall be retained by the owner to whom issued and returned by the owner to the tax collector of the county or the Department of Revenue, as the case may be. (6)  The Adjutant General is authorized to recognize not more than one hundred (100) senior staff officers, commanders, command sergeants major and senior enlisted advisors by designating the issue of National Guard distinctive license plates or tags numbered "1" through "100."  These license plates or tags shall be retained by the individual so designated and may be transferred between vehicles or individuals under procedures established by the Department of Revenue.  The Adjutant General is responsible for furnishing the Department of Revenue necessary information to effect issue or transfer of these specially numbered license plates or tags. (7)  National Guard plates or tags shall be prepared and furnished for the licensing year commencing November 1, 1962, and annually thereafter.  The Adjutant General shall furnish the Department of Revenue with an estimate of the number of such distinctive plates or tags required in each of the several counties of the state. (8)  The provisions of this section are supplementary to the laws of this state pertaining to the licensing of motor vehicles and nothing herein shall be construed as abridging or repealing any of such laws. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.